Massachusetts, session 194th, H4228.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The Town of Athol may, by its ordinances, regulate rents for the use or
occupancy of manufactured housing parks in the town, establish a rent board for the purpose of
regulating rents, minimum standards for use or occupancy of manufactured housing park
accommodations and eviction of tenants therefrom and may, by its ordinances, require the
registration, by owners of manufactured housing parks under penalty of perjury, of information
relating to the manufactured home park accommodations. The rent board shall have all powers
necessary or convenient to perform its functions, may make rules and regulations, require the
registration, by owners of manufactured housing parks under penalty of perjury, of information
relating to the manufactured housing park accommodations. Violations of any by-law adopted
of 3

pursuant to this act or any order of the rent board shall be punishable by a fine of not more than
$1,000.
SECTION 2. (a) The rent board, established pursuant to section l, may make individual
or general adjustments, either upward or downward, as may be necessary to assure that rents for
manufactured home park accommodations in the town are established. (b) The following factors,
among other relevant factors, which the board may define by regulation, shall be considered in
determining whether controlled manufactured home park accommodations yield a fair net
operating income: (1) increases or decreases in property taxes; (2) unavoidable increases or any
decreases in operating and maintenance expenses; (3) capital improvements of the mobile home
park as distinguished from ordinary repair, replacement and maintenance; (4) increases or
decreases in space, services, equipment or other similar factors; (5) substantial deterioration of
the manufactured home park other than as a result or ordinary wear and tear; and (6) failure to
perform ordinary repair, replacement and maintenance.
SECTION 3. Chapter 30A of the General Laws shall apply to the rent board, established
pursuant to section l, as if the rent board were an agency of the commonwealth, including
provisions relating to judicial review of an agency order.
SECTION 4. (a) The district court shall have original jurisdiction, concurrently with the
superior court, of all petitions for review brought pursuant to section 14 of chapter 30A of the
General Laws. (b) The superior court shall have original jurisdiction to enforce this act and any
by-laws adopted thereunder and may restrain violations thereof.
SECTION 5. The Town of Athol may, by its ordinances, regulate the eviction of tenants.
The rent board, established pursuant to section 1, may issue orders which shall be a defense to
of 3

actions of summary process for possession and such orders shall be reviewable pursuant to
sections 3 and 4.
SECTION 6. The personnel, if any, of the rent board, established pursuant to section l,
shall not be subject to section 94, of chapter 30 of the General Laws or chapter 3 1 of the General
Laws.
SECTION 7. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 3